Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-524.01
Information technology plan; report required.

On or before September 15 of each even-numbered year, all state agencies, boards, and commissions shall report to the Chief Information Officer, in a format determined by the commission, an information technology plan that includes an accounting of all technology assets, including planned acquisitions and upgrades.

Laws 2008, LB823, § 6.